foma/akkadian.foma
! finish lowercasing accents on vowels, special consonants

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/noun.lex 
define NounLexicon ;

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/name.lex
define NameLexicon ;

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/adj.lex
define AdjLexicon ;

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/verbs.lex
define VerbLexicon ;

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/prep.lex
define PrepLexicon ;

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/default.lex
define UnknownLexicon ;

read lexc /Users/david/Documents/git/akkadian-morph-analyzer/foma/default_noun.lex
define UnknownNounLexicon ;

define Vowel [a|e|i|u|A|E|I|U|ā|ē|ī|ū] ;
define DINGIR D I N G I R ;
define GAL G A L ;
define DU10  D U 1 {0};
define Dental [d|t|ṭ|D|T];
define Sibilants [z|s|š|ṣ|ś|Z|S|Š|Ṣ|Ś|Z];

define Consonant [b|d|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|š|t|w|z|B|D|G|H|K|L|M|N|P|Q|R|S|Š|T|W|Z] ;

define GStemPreterite 	R1 -> i  || _ ?* [ %+GStem %+Pret %+3CS | %+GStem %+Pret %+3MP | %+GStem %+Pret %+3FP ] ,,
				R1 -> t a  || _ ?* [%+GStem %+Pret %+2MS |%+GStem %+Pret %+2FS |%+GStem %+Pret %+2CP] ,,
				R1 -> a  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Pret %+1CS ,,
				R1 -> n i  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Pret %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+GStem %+Pret %+3FP | %+GStem %+Pret %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Pret %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Pret %+2FS ;
				
define addPreteriteThemeVowel [..] -> a || _ R3 ?* "a" "^" PV1 ?* [ %+Pret | %+Imp ],,
								[..] -> e || _ R3 ?* "e" "^" PV1 ?* [ %+Pret | %+Imp ] ,,
								[..] -> o || _ R3 ?* "o" "^" PV1 ?* [ %+Pret | %+Imp ] ,,
								[..] -> i || _ R3 ?* "i" "^" PV1 ?* [ %+Pret | %+Imp ]  ;

define addDurativeThemeVowel [..] -> a || _ R3 ?* "a" "^" DV1 ?* [ %+Dur | %+Perf ] ,,
								[..] -> e || _ R3 ?* "e" "^" DV1 ?* [ %+Dur | %+Perf ] ,,
								[..] -> o || _ R3 ?* "o" "^" DV1 ?* [ %+Dur | %+Perf ] ,,
								[..] -> i || _ R3 ?* "i" "^" DV1 ?* [ %+Dur | %+Perf ] ;

define deleteEnd	Vowel PV1 -> 0 ,,
					Vowel DV1 -> 0 ,,
					"_" -> 0 ;

define GStemDurative 	R1 -> i  || _ ?* [ %+GStem %+Dur %+3CS | %+GStem %+Dur %+3MP | %+GStem %+Dur %+3FP ] ,,
				R1 -> t a  || _ ?* [%+GStem %+Dur %+2MS |%+GStem %+Dur %+2FS |%+GStem %+Dur %+2CP] ,,
				R1 -> a  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Dur %+1CS ,,
				R1 -> n i  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Dur %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+GStem %+Dur %+3FP | %+GStem %+Dur %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Dur %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Dur %+2FS ,,
				R2 -> a  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Dur ?* ,,
				b -> b b , d -> d d , g -> g g , h -> h h , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n , p -> p p , q -> q q , r -> r r , s -> s s , š -> š š , t -> t t , w -> w w , z -> z z  || _ "^" R3  ?* %+GStem %+Dur ;

define GStemImperative	R4 -> ā  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Imp %+2CP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Imp %+2FS ,,
				R2 -> a || _ ?* "a" "^" PV1 ?* %+GStem %+Imp ,,
				R2 -> e || _ ?* "e" "^" PV1 ?* %+GStem %+Imp ,,
				R2 -> i || _ ?* "i" "^" PV1 ?* %+GStem %+Imp ,,
				R2 -> u || _ ?* "u" "^" PV1 ?* %+GStem %+Imp ,,
				Vowel (->) 0 || _ R3 ?* %+GStem %+Imp %+2CP , _ R3 ?* %+GStem %+Imp %+2FS ;				

define GStemPerfect 	R1 -> i  || _ ?* [ %+GStem %+Perf %+3CS | %+GStem %+Perf %+3MP | %+GStem %+Perf %+3FP ] ,,
				R1 -> t a  || _ ?* [%+GStem %+Perf %+2MS |%+GStem %+Perf %+2FS |%+GStem %+Perf %+2CP] ,,
				R1 -> a  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Perf %+1CS ,,
				R1 -> n i  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Perf %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+GStem %+Perf %+3FP | %+GStem %+Perf %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Perf %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+GStem %+Perf %+2FS ,,
				R2 -> t a || _ ?* %+GStem %+Perf ,,
				Vowel -> 0 || _ R3 ?* %+GStem %+Perf [%+2CP| %+2FS | %+3FP | %+3MP ] ;	

define DStemPreterite 	R1 -> u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Pret [ %+3CS | %+3MP | %+3FP | %+1CS ] ,,
				R1 -> t u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Pret [ %+2MS | %+2FS | %+2CP ] ,,
				R1 -> n u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Pret %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+DStem %+Pret %+3FP | %+DStem %+Pret %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Pret %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Pret %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+DStem %+Pret ,, 
				R2 -> a  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Pret ?* ;

define DStemDurative 	R1 -> u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Dur [ %+3CS | %+3MP | %+3FP | %+1CS ] ,,
				R1 -> t u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Dur [ %+2MS | %+2FS | %+2CP ] ,,
				R1 -> n u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Dur %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+DStem %+Dur %+3FP | %+DStem %+Dur %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Dur %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Dur %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> a || _ R3 ?* %+DStem %+Dur ,, 
				R2 -> a  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Dur ?* ;

define DStemPerfect	R1 -> u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Perf [ %+3CS | %+3MP | %+3FP | %+1CS ] ,,
				R1 -> t u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Perf [ %+2MS | %+2FS | %+2CP ] ,,
				R1 -> n u  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Perf %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+DStem %+Perf %+3FP | %+DStem %+Perf %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Perf %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Perf %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+DStem %+Perf ,, 
				R2 -> t a || _ ?* %+DStem %+Perf ;			

define DStemImperative	R4 -> ā  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Imp %+2CP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+DStem %+Imp %+2FS ,,
				R2 -> u || _ ?* %+DStem %+Imp ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+DStem %+Imp ;				

define DStemDoubling b -> b b , d -> d d , g -> g g , h -> h h , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n , p -> p p , q -> q q , r -> r r , s -> s s , š -> š š , t -> t t , w -> w w , z -> z z  || _ "^" R3  ?* %+DStem ;

define deleteWeakRadicals ALEPH -> 0 ;

define SStemPreterite 	R1 -> u š a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Pret [ %+3CS | %+3MP | %+3FP | %+1CS ] ,,
				R1 -> t u š a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Pret [ %+2MS | %+2FS | %+2CP ] ,,
				R1 -> n u š a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Pret %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+SStem %+Pret %+3FP | %+SStem %+Pret %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Pret %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Pret %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+SStem %+Pret ;

define SStemDurative 	R1 -> u š a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Dur [ %+3CS | %+3MP | %+3FP | %+1CS ] ,,
				R1 -> t u š a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Dur [ %+2MS | %+2FS | %+2CP ] ,,
				R1 -> n u š a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Dur %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+SStem %+Dur %+3FP | %+SStem %+Dur %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Dur %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Dur %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> a || _ R3 ?* %+SStem %+Dur ;

define SStemPerfect	R1 -> u š t a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Perf [ %+3CS | %+3MP | %+3FP | %+1CS ] ,,
				R1 -> t u š t a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Perf [ %+2MS | %+2FS | %+2CP ] ,,
				R1 -> n u š t a  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Perf %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+SStem %+Perf %+3FP | %+SStem %+Perf %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Perf %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Perf %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+SStem %+Perf ;

define SStemImperative	R1 -> š u  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Imp ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Imp %+2CP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+SStem %+Imp %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+SStem %+Imp ;

define NStemPreterite 	R1 -> i n  || _ ?* [ %+NStem %+Pret %+3CS | %+NStem %+Pret %+3MP | %+NStem %+Pret %+3FP ] ,,
				R1 -> t a n  || _ ?* [%+NStem %+Pret %+2MS |%+NStem %+Pret %+2FS |%+NStem %+Pret %+2CP] ,,
				R1 -> a n  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Pret %+1CS ,,
				R1 -> n i n  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Pret %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+NStem %+Pret %+3FP | %+NStem %+Pret %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Pret %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Pret %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+NStem %+Pret ;

define NStemDurative 	R1 -> i n  || _ ?* [ %+NStem %+Dur %+3CS | %+NStem %+Dur %+3MP | %+NStem %+Dur %+3FP ] ,,
				R1 -> t a n  || _ ?* [%+NStem %+Dur %+2MS |%+NStem %+Dur %+2FS |%+NStem %+Dur %+2CP] ,,
				R1 -> a n  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Dur %+1CS ,,
				R1 -> n i n  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Dur %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+NStem %+Dur %+3FP | %+NStem %+Dur %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Dur %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Dur %+2FS ,,
				R2 -> a  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Dur ?* ,,
				b -> b b , d -> d d , g -> g g , h -> h h , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n , p -> p p , q -> q q , r -> r r , s -> s s , š -> š š , t -> t t , w -> w w , z -> z z  || _ "^" R3  ?* %+NStem %+Dur ;

define NStemPerfect 	R1 -> i n t a  || _ ?* [ %+NStem %+Perf %+3CS | %+NStem %+Perf %+3MP | %+NStem %+Perf %+3FP ] ,,
				R1 -> t a n t a  || _ ?* [%+NStem %+Perf %+2MS |%+NStem %+Perf %+2FS |%+NStem %+Perf %+2CP] ,,
				R1 -> a n t a  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Perf %+1CS ,,
				R1 -> n i n t a  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Perf %+1CP ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* [%+NStem %+Perf %+3FP | %+NStem %+Perf %+2CP ] ,,
				R4 -> ū  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Perf %+3MP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Perf %+2FS ;
				
define NStemImperative	R1 -> n a  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Imp ,,
				R4 -> ā  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Imp %+2CP ,,
				R4 -> ī  || _ ?* %+NStem %+Imp %+2FS ,,
				Vowel -> i || _ R3 ?* %+NStem %+Imp ;


define VerbCleanup [R1|R2|R3|R4|V1|"^"] -> 0 ;
define SymbolCleanup [R1|%+GStem|%+SStem|%+NStem|%+DStem|%+Perf|%+2FS|%+Pret|%+Dur|%+3CS|%+2CP|%+3FP|%+3MP|%+1CS|%+1CP|%+2MS|%+2FS|%+Imp] -> 0 ;

define VerbGrammar VerbLexicon .o. addPreteriteThemeVowel .o. addDurativeThemeVowel .o. GStemPreterite .o. DStemPreterite .o. GStemDurative .o. GStemImperative .o. GStemPerfect  .o. DStemDurative .o. DStemPerfect .o. DStemImperative .o. DStemDoubling  .o. SStemPreterite .o. SStemDurative .o. SStemPerfect .o. SStemImperative  .o. NStemPreterite .o. NStemDurative .o. NStemPerfect .o. NStemImperative .o. VerbCleanup .o. SymbolCleanup .o. deleteWeakRadicals .o. deleteEnd ; ! ;.o. 



define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ,,
				"y" -> 0 ,,
				"/" -> 0 ,,
				"*" -> 0 ,,
				"." -> 0 ,,
				"[" -> 0 ,,
				"]" -> 0 ,,
				"--" -> "-" ,,
				"-" -> 0;

define StripAlephs [ˀ|'] -> 0;
